Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2474.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 256.32A, subsection 5, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 5. This section is repealed July 1, 2027 2032 . Sec. 2. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION ââ AUTOMATED EXTERNAL DEFIBRILLATOR AND CARDIAC EMERGENCY RESPONSE PLANS ââ REPORT. 1. As used in this section: a. âAutomated external defibrillatorâ means a lightweight, portable device that delivers an electric shock through the chest to the heart to stop an irregular heartbeat and allow normal heartbeat rhythm to resume following cardiac arrest. b. âCardiac emergency response planâ means a written document that establishes the specific steps to be taken by employees or contractors of a school to respond to incidents involving an individual experiencing cardiac arrest or a similar life-threatening emergency on school property, during physical education, during an extracurricular athletic activity or contest, during practice associated with an extracurricular athletic activity or contest, or during a school-sponsored activity, and to reduce the likelihood of the individualâs Senate File 2474, p. 2 death from cardiac arrest or a similar life-threatening emergency. c. âSchoolâ means all of the following: (1) A school district organized pursuant to chapter 274. (2) A charter school established pursuant to chapter 256E. (3) A charter school or innovation zone school established pursuant to chapter 256F. 2. The department of education, in coordination with each school, shall prepare a report that includes information related to all of the following: a. The number of schools that have adopted and implemented a cardiac emergency response plan. b. The number of automated external defibrillators owned by each school, regardless of whether any such automated external defibrillator is in good working order, and where each automated external defibrillator is located on the schoolâs property. 3. The department of education shall submit the report described in subsection 2 to the general assembly on or before January 15, 2027. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 2474, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor